Maine, session 132, LD1960.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §4403-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. E, §20 and
affected by §28, is amended to read:
2. Tobacco products containing cannabis or ingestible consumer products
containing hemp. The tax imposed on tobacco products does not apply to the sale of an
electronic smoking device or other tobacco product containing adult use cannabis subject
to tax under chapter 723 or, an electronic smoking device or other tobacco product
containing cannabis or cannabis products subject to control under Title 22, chapter 558‑C
or an electronic smoking device or other tobacco product containing ingestible consumer
products containing hemp or cannabidiol derived from hemp. For the purposes of this
subsection, "hemp" has the same meaning as in Title 7, section 2231, subsection 1-A,
paragraph D.